Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-614
Liability for criminal offense; civil liability; violation of professional oath or code of ethics.

(1) A surrogate shall not be guilty of any criminal offense, subject to any civil liability, or in violation of any professional oath or code of ethics or conduct for any action taken in good faith pursuant to the Health Care Surrogacy Act.

(2) No primary health care provider, other health care provider, or health care facility shall be subject to criminal prosecution, civil liability, or professional disciplinary action for acting or declining to act in reliance upon the decision made by a person whom the primary health care provider or other health care provider in good faith believes is the surrogate. This subsection does not limit the liability of a primary health care provider, other health care provider, or health care facility for a negligent act or omission in connection with the medical diagnosis, treatment, or care of the individual.

Laws 2018, LB104, § 14.